Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1281YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 192 Section 1. Section 364.12, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. The abutting property owner may be required by ordinance 3 to maintain all property outside the lot and property lines and 4 inside the curb lines upon the public streets, except that the 5 property owner shall not be required to remove diseased trees 6 or dead wood on the publicly owned property or right-of-way. 7 The abutting property owner may be liable for damages caused by 8 the failure to use reasonable care in maintaining such property 9 if required by ordinance. 10 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 11 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 12